Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2305
Approved nurse practitioner program, defined.

Approved nurse practitioner program means a program which:

(1) Is a graduate-level program accredited by a national accrediting body recognized by the United States Department of Education;

(2) Includes, but is not limited to, instruction in biological, behavioral, and health sciences relevant to practice as a nurse practitioner in a specific clinical area; and

(3) For the specialties of women's health and neonatal, grants a post-master certificate, master's degree, or doctoral degree for all applicants who graduated on or after July 1, 2007, and for all other specialties, grants a post-master certificate, master's degree, or doctoral degree for all applicants who graduated on or after July 19, 1996.

Laws 1981, LB 379, § 14;

Laws 1984, LB 724, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 67;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 22;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 41;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 56;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1717;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 797;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 75.